Virginia statutes. Title 43. Mechanics’ and Certain Other Liens.
Chapter 2. Liens on Franchises and Property of Transportation, etc., Companies.

§ 43-24.
Liens of employees, suppliers, etc.

All conductors, brakemen, engine drivers, firemen, captains, stewards, pilots, clerks, depot or office agents, storekeepers, mechanics, traveling representatives or laborers, and all persons furnishing railroad iron, engines, cars, fuel and all other supplies necessary to the operation of any railway, canal or other transportation company, and all clerks, mechanics, traveling representatives, foremen, and laborers, and superintendents to the extent of not more than $100 per week, who furnish their services or labor to any one or more individuals trading under a real or fictitious name, or names, or to any partnership or other unincorporated body of persons, engaged in mining or manufacturing, or to any mining or manufacturing company, whether such railway, canal or other transportation or mining or manufacturing company be chartered under or by the laws of this Commonwealth, or be chartered elsewhere and be doing business within the limits of this Commonwealth, shall have a prior lien on the franchises, gross earnings and on all the real and personal property of such individual, partnership, unincorporated association or company which is used in operating the same, to the extent of the moneys due them by the individual, partnership, unincorporated association or company for such wages or supplies, which lien shall be superior to, and have priority over, any amount due by such individual, partnership, unincorporated association or company for rents, or royalties.

No mortgage, deed of trust, sale, hypothecation or conveyance executed since the first day of May, 1888, shall defeat or take precedence over such lien. The lien secured by this section to parties furnishing supplies, shall be subordinate to that allowed to clerks, mechanics, foremen, superintendents, and laborers for services furnished as aforesaid.

If any person entitled to a lien as well under §

43-3

as under this section, shall perfect his lien given by either section, he shall not be entitled to the benefit of the other.

No right to or remedy upon a lien which has already accrued to any person shall be extended, abridged or otherwise affected hereby.

History.

Code 1919, § 6438; 1922, p. 13; 1932, p. 596; 1938, p. 17; 2010, c. 343.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 343 substituted “$100” for “twenty-five dollars” in the first sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 57; 2B M.J. Bankruptcy, § 113; 12A M.J. Liens, §§ 11, 12; 12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 12.

§ 43-25.
Perfection and enforcement of lien.

No person shall be entitled to the lien given by §

43-24

unless he shall, within ninety days after the last item of his bill becomes due and payable for which such supplies are furnished or service rendered, file in the clerk’s office of the circuit court of the county or circuit court of the city in which is located the chief office in this Commonwealth of the company against which the claim is, or in the clerk’s office of the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond when such office is in the city, or within that time shall file with the receiver, trustee or assignee of such company, a memorandum of the amount and consideration of his claim, and the time or times when the same is, or will become due and payable, verified by affidavit, which memorandum, if filed with the clerk or in his office, the clerk shall forthwith record in the miscellaneous lien book and index the same in the name of the claimant and also in the name of the company against which the claim is, as required by §

43-4

. Any such lien may be enforced in a court of equity.

History.

Code 1919, § 6439; 1928, p. 760.

Cross references.

For requirement that liens be recorded in the general deed book and indexed in the general index of deeds, see §

43-4.1

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 57; 2B M.J. Bankruptcy, § 113; 12A M.J. Liens, §§ 11, 12; 12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 12.

§ 43-26.
Assignee’s rights.

Any assignee of such a claim as is mentioned in the preceding sections may file the memorandum and make the oath required by such sections, and shall have the same rights as his assignor.

History.

Code 1919, § 6440.

Cross references.

As to protection of assignee, transferee or indorsee of debt secured by mechanics’ lien, see §

43-65

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97; 16 M.J. Schools, § 2.